tests/ту.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах ту":
    ту<n><nom> :  ту 
    ту<n><gen> :  тӑвӑн 
    ту<n><dat> :  тӑва 
    ту<n><loc> :  тура 
    ту<n><abl> :  туран 
    ту<n><ins> :  тупа 
    ту<n>+сӑр<post> :  тусӑр 
    ту<n><ter> :  тушӑн
    ту<n><px1sg><nom> :  тӑвӑм 
    ту<n><px1sg><gen> :  тӑвӑмӑн 
    ту<n><px1sg><dat> :  тӑвӑма 
    ту<n><px1sg><loc> :  тӑвӑмра 
    ту<n><px1sg><abl> :  тӑвӑмран 
    ту<n><px1sg><ins> :  тӑвӑмпа 
    ту<n><px1sg>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑмсӑр 
    ту<n><px1sg><ter> :  тӑвӑмшӑн
    ту<n><px2sg><nom> :  тӑву 
    ту<n><px2sg><gen> :  тӑвун 
    ту<n><px2sg><dat> :  тӑвна
    ту<n><px2sg><loc> :  тӑвунта 
    ту<n><px2sg><abl> :  тӑвунтан 
    ту<n><px2sg><ins> :  тӑвупа 
    ту<n><px2sg>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвусӑр 
    ту<n><px2sg><ter> :  тӑвушӑн
    ту<n><px3sp><nom> :  тӑвӗ 
    ту<n><px3sp><gen> :  тӑвӗн 
    ту<n><px3sp><dat> :  тӑвне 
    ту<n><px3sp><loc> :  тӑвӗнче 
    ту<n><px3sp><abl> :  тӑвӗнчен 
    ту<n><px3sp><ins> :  тӑвӗпе 
    ту<n><px3sp>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӗсӗр 
    ту<n><px3sp><ter> :  тӑвӗшӗн
    ту<n><px1pl><nom> :  тӑвӑмӑр 
    ту<n><px1pl><gen> :  тӑвӑмӑрӑн 
    ту<n><px1pl><dat> :  тӑвӑмӑра 
    ту<n><px1pl><loc> :  тӑвӑмӑрта 
    ту<n><px1pl><abl> :  тӑвӑмӑртан 
    ту<n><px1pl><ins> :  тӑвӑмӑрпа 
    ту<n><px1pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑмӑрсӑр 
    ту<n><px1pl><ter> :  тӑвӑмӑршӑн
    ту<n><px2pl><nom> :  тӑвӑр 
    ту<n><px2pl><gen> :  тӑвӑрӑн 
    ту<n><px2pl><dat> :  тӑвӑра 
    ту<n><px2pl><loc> :  тӑвӑрта 
    ту<n><px2pl><abl> :  тӑвӑртан 
    ту<n><px2pl><ins> :  тӑвӑрпа 
    ту<n><px2pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑрсӑр 
    ту<n><px2pl><ter> :  тӑвӑршӑн
    ту<n><pl><nom> :  тусем 
    ту<n><pl><gen> :  тусен 
    ту<n><pl><dat> :  тусене 
    ту<n><pl><loc> :  тусенче 
    ту<n><pl><abl> :  тусенчен 
    ту<n><pl><ins> :  тусемпе 
    ту<n><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тусемсӗр 
    ту<n><pl><ter> :  тусемшӗн
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  тӑвӑмсем 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  тӑвӑмсен 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  тӑвӑмсене 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  тӑвӑмсенче 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  тӑвӑмсенчен 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  тӑвӑмсемпе 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑмсемсӗр 
    ту<n><px1sg><pl><ter> :  тӑвӑмсемшӗн
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  тӑвусем 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  тӑвусен 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  тӑвусене 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  тӑвусенче 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  тӑвусенчен 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  тӑвусемпе 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвусемсӗр 
    ту<n><px2sg><pl><ter> :  тӑвусемшӗн
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  тӑвӗсем 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  тӑвӗсен 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  тӑвӗсене 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  тӑвӗсенче 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  тӑвӗсенчен 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  тӑвӗсемпе 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӗсемсӗр 
    ту<n><px3sp><pl><ter> :  тӑвӗсемшӗн
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  тӑвӑмӑрсем 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  тӑвӑмӑрсен 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  тӑвӑмӑрсене 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  тӑвӑмӑрсенче 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  тӑвӑмӑрсенчен 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  тӑвӑмӑрсемпе 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    ту<n><px1pl><pl><ter> :  тӑвӑмӑрсемшӗн
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  тӑвӑрсем 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  тӑвӑрсен 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  тӑвӑрсене 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  тӑвӑрсенче 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  тӑвӑрсенчен 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  тӑвӑрсемпе 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl>+сӑр<post> :  тӑвӑрсемсӗр 
    ту<n><px2pl><pl><ter> :  тӑвӑрсемшӗн

  "Forms of verb ту":
    ту<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : тӑватӑп
    ту<v><tv><pres><p2><sg> : тӑватӑн
    ту<v><tv><pres><p3><sg> : тӑвать
    ту<v><tv><pres><p1><pl> : тӑватпӑр
    ту<v><tv><pres><p2><pl> : тӑватӑр
    ту<v><tv><pres><p3><pl> : тӑваҫҫӗ
    ту<v><tv><fut><p1><sg> : тӑвӑп
    ту<v><tv><fut><p2><sg> : тӑвӑн
    ту<v><tv><fut><p3><sg> : тӑвӗ
    ту<v><tv><fut><p1><pl> : тӑвӑпӑр
    ту<v><tv><fut><p2><pl> : тӑвӑр
    ту<v><tv><fut><p3><pl> : тӑвӗҫ
    ту<v><tv><imp><p3><sg> : тутӑр
    ту<v><tv><imp><p2><pl> : тӑвӑр
    ту<v><tv><imp><p3><pl> : туччӑр
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p1><sg> : тумӑп
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p2><sg> : тумӑн
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p3><sg> : тумӗ
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p1><pl> : тумӑпӑр
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p2><pl> : тумӑр
    ту<v><tv><neg><fut><p3><pl> : тумӗҫ
